Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1613
Department; produce manuals; contents.

The department shall produce manuals for use by architects, engineers, prime contractors, and owners. Such manuals shall be furnished upon request at a price sufficient to cover the costs of production. Such manuals shall contain, but not be limited to:

(1) The Nebraska Energy Code;

(2) Forms, charts, tables, and other data to assist architects, engineers, and prime contractors in meeting the Nebraska Energy Code; and

(3) Any other information which the department determines will assist local code officials in enforcing the code.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 37;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 161.